Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.666

Termination of registration.

The secretary of state may terminate the registration of a registered foreign limited partnership in accordance with RCW 23.95.550.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6124; 2009 c 188 s 906.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.